Utah statutes.
41-3-409.   Certificate of title -- Brand -- Reporting requirements.

A manufacturer, its agent, or a dealer who accepts the return of a nonconforming vehicle, shall:

(1)  immediately upon receipt, cause the words "MANUFACTURER BUYBACK NONCONFORMING VEHICLE" to be clearly and conspicuously stamped on the face of the original certificate of title, the Manufacturer's Statement of Origin, or other evidence of ownership; and

(2)  within 10 days of receipt of the certificate of title, Manufacturer's Statement of Origin, or other evidence of ownership, submit a copy of the face of that stamped document to the Motor Vehicle Division of the Tax Commission.



Enacted by Chapter 163, 1993 General Session

